Maryland, session 2025, HB0143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–106.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL OR PACKAGE” MEANS AN ITEM DELIVERED OR
LEFT TO BE COLLECTED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE OR A DELIVERY
SERVICE COMPANY THAT DELIVERS TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT
PERMISSION OF THE INTENDED RECIPIENT OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE OBTAIN OR
EXERT CONTROL OVER MAIL OR A PACKAGE DELIVERED TO ANOTHER WITH THE
INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OWNER OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0143*

HOUSE BILL 143
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS.
(2) AS A CONDITION OF SENTENCING, THE COURT MAY ORDER THE
DEFENDANT TO STAY AWAY FROM:
(I) THE LOCATION WHERE THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION
OCCURRED;
(II) ALL REAL PROPERTY OWNED BY THE VICTIM;
(III) THE VICTIM’S PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT; AND
(IV) ANY LOCATION THAT THE STATE’S ATTORNEY PROVED AT
TRIAL THAT THE DEFENDANT TARGETED IN THE COURSE OF VIOLATING THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.